California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(E) A syndication or other combination of any of the entities specified in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) that is organized to purchase the promissory note.

(F) The California Housing Finance Agency or a local housing finance agency organized under the
 Health and Safety Code.

(G) A licensed residential mortgage lender or servicer acting under the authority of that license.

(H) A licensed real estate broker selling all or part of the loan, note, or contract to a lender or purchaser specified in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(5) A real estate broker who deposits funds held in trust in an out-of-state depository institution in accordance with paragraph (3) shall make available, in this state, the books, records, and files pertaining to the trust accounts to the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives or pay the reasonable expenses for travel and lodging incurred by the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives in order to conduct an examination at an out-of-state location.

(b) A real estate broker acting as a principal pursuant to Section 10131.1 shall place all funds received from others for the purchase of real property sales contracts or promissory notes secured directly or collaterally by liens on real property in a neutral escrow depository unless delivery of the contract or note is made simultaneously with the receipt of the purchase funds.

(c) A real estate salesperson who accepts trust funds from others on behalf of the broker under whom he or she is licensed shall immediately deliver the funds to the broker or, if so directed by the broker, shall deliver the funds into the custody of the broker’s principal or a neutral escrow depository or shall deposit the funds into the broker’s trust fund account.

(d) If not otherwise expressly prohibited by this part, a real estate broker may, at the request of the owner of trust funds or
 of the principals to a transaction or series of transactions from whom the broker has received trust funds, deposit the funds into an interest-bearing account in a bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or industrial loan company, the accounts of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The account is in the name of the broker as trustee for the designated beneficiary or principal of a transaction or series of transactions.

(2) All of the funds in the account are covered by insurance provided by an agency of the United States.

(3) The funds in the account are kept separate, distinct, and apart from funds belonging to the broker or to any other person for whom the broker holds funds in trust.

(4) The broker discloses to the person from whom the trust funds are received, and to a beneficiary whose identity is known to the broker at the time of establishing the account, the nature of the account, how interest will be calculated and paid under various circumstances, whether service charges will be paid to the depository and by whom, and possible notice requirements or penalties for withdrawal of funds from the account.

(5) Interest earned on funds in the account shall not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of the broker or a person licensed to the broker.

(6) In an executory sale, lease, or loan transaction in which the broker accepts funds in trust to be applied to the purchase, lease, or loan, the parties to the contract shall have specified in the contract or by collateral written agreement the person
 to whom interest earned on the funds is to be paid or credited.

(e) The broker shall have no obligation to place trust funds into an interest-bearing account unless requested to do so and unless all of the conditions in subdivision (d) are met, nor, in any event, if he or she advises the party making the request that the funds will not be placed in an interest-bearing account.

(f) Subdivision (d) does not preclude the commissioner from prescribing, by regulation, circumstances in which, and conditions under which, a real estate broker is authorized to deposit funds received in trust into an interest-bearing trust fund account.

(g) The broker shall maintain a separate record of the receipt and disposition of all funds described in subdivisions (a) and (b), including any interest earned on the funds.

(h) Upon request of the commissioner, a broker shall furnish to the commissioner an authorization for examination of financial records of those trust fund accounts maintained in a financial institution, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(i) As used in this section, “neutral escrow” means an escrow business conducted by a person licensed under Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code or by a person described in paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 17006 of that code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 12.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10146.

Any real estate broker who contracts for or collects an advance fee from any other person, hereinafter referred to as the “principal,” shall deposit any such amount or amounts, when collected in a trust account with a bank or other recognized depository. Such funds are trust funds and not the funds of the agent. Amounts may be withdrawn therefrom for the benefit of the agent only when actually expended for the benefit of the principal or five days after the verified accounts mentioned hereinafter have been mailed to the principal. Upon request of the commissioner, a broker shall furnish to the commissioner an authorization for examination of financial records of the trust account in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 7473 of the Government Code.

The
 commissioner may issue such rules and regulations as he or she deems necessary to regulate the method of accounting, and to accomplish the purpose of the provisions of this code relating to advance fees including, but not limited to, establishing forms for and determining information to be included in such accountings. Each principal shall be furnished a verified copy of such accountings at the end of each calendar quarter and when the contract has been completely performed by the licensee. The commissioner shall be furnished a verified copy of any account or all accounts on his or her demand therefor.

Where advance fees actually paid by or on behalf of any principal are not handled in accordance with the preceding paragraph, it shall be presumed that the agent has violated Sections 506 and 506a of the Penal Code. The principal may recover treble damages for amounts so misapplied and shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees in any action brought to recover
 the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 99.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10147.

(a) On or before January 1, 1993, the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission shall develop, adopt, and publish a Commercial Property Owner’s Guide to Earthquake Safety for distribution to licensees for purposes of Section 2079.9 of the Civil Code and, upon request, to any member of the general public.

(b) In developing the guide, the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission shall consult with the Office of Emergency Services, the California Geological Survey in the Department of Conservation, the Department of Real Estate, and other interested agencies and persons.

(c) The commission shall, to the extent possible,
 rely on currently available data to develop the guide. To the extent necessary, the commission may contract for the development and production of the guide. The commission shall update the contents of the guide whenever it determines that information within the guide is sufficiently inaccurate or incomplete so as to reduce the effectiveness of the guide. The commission shall charge a fee to cover the costs of production, distribution, development, and updating the guide.

(d) The guide shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Maps and information on geologic and seismic hazard conditions in the state.

(2) Explanations of typical structural and nonstructural earthquake hazards.

(3) Recommendations for mitigating the hazards of an earthquake, including references and explanations of what constitutes “adequate wall anchorage” as defined in Section 8893.1 of the Government Code.

(4) A statement that there are no guarantees of safety or damage prevention that can be made with respect to a major earthquake and that only precautions, such as retrofitting, can be taken to reduce the risk of various types of earthquake damage. For purposes of preparing the statement, the commission shall confer with insurers and design professional associations.

(5) Notice of the obligation to post a sign as required by Section 8875.8 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 3.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10147.5.

(a) Any printed or form agreement that initially establishes, or is intended to establish, or alters the terms of any agreement that previously established a right to compensation to be paid to a real estate licensee for the sale of residential real property containing not more than four residential units, or for the sale of a mobilehome, shall contain the following statement in not less than 10-point boldface type immediately preceding any provision of such agreement relating to compensation of the licensee:

Notice: The amount or rate of real estate commissions is not fixed by law. They are set by each broker individually and may be negotiable between the seller and broker.

(b) Any printed or form agreement that
 initially establishes or is intended to establish, or alters the terms of any agreement that previously established a right to compensation to be paid to a real estate licensee for the purchase of residential real property containing not more than four residential units, or for the purchase of a mobilehome, shall contain the following statement in not less than 10-point boldface type immediately preceding any provision of such agreement relating to compensation of the licensee:

Notice: The amount or rate of real estate compensation is not fixed by law. They are set by each broker individually and may be negotiable between the buyer and broker.

(c) The amount or rate of compensation shall not be printed in any such agreement described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of a transfer of title
 to real property.

(e) As used in this section, “alters the terms of any agreement which previously established a right to compensation” means an increase in the rate of compensation, or the amount of compensation if initially established as a flat fee, from the agreement which previously established a right to compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10147.6.

(a) Any licensee who negotiates, attempts to negotiate, arranges, attempts to arrange, or otherwise offers to perform a mortgage loan modification or other form of mortgage loan forbearance for a fee or other form of compensation paid by the borrower, shall provide the following to the borrower, as a separate statement, in not less than 14-point bold type, prior to entering into any fee agreement with the borrower:

 It is not necessary to pay a third party to arrange for a loan modification or other form of forbearance from your mortgage lender or servicer. You may call your lender directly to ask for a change in your loan terms. Nonprofit housing counseling agencies also offer these and other forms of borrower assistance free of charge. A
 list of nonprofit housing counseling agencies approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) is available from your local HUD office or by visiting www.hud.gov.

(b) If loan modification or other mortgage loan forbearance services are offered or negotiated in one of the languages set forth in Section 1632 of the Civil Code, a translated copy of the statement in subdivision (a) shall be provided to the borrower in that foreign language.

(c) A violation of this section by a natural person who is a licensee is a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or if by a corporation, the violation is punishable by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand
 dollars ($50,000). These penalties are cumulative to any other remedies or penalties provided by law.

(d) This section shall apply only to mortgages and deeds of trust secured by residential real property containing four or fewer dwelling units.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 630, Sec. 7.   (SB 94)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10148.

(a) A licensed real estate broker shall retain for three years copies of all listings, deposit receipts, canceled checks, trust records, and other documents executed by the broker or obtained by the broker in connection with any transactions for which a real estate broker license is required. The retention period shall run from the date of the closing of the transaction or from the date of the listing if the transaction is not consummated. After notice, the books, accounts, and records shall be made available for examination, inspection, and copying by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designated representative during regular business hours; and shall, upon the appearance of sufficient cause, be subject to audit without further notice,
 except that the audit shall not be harassing in nature. This subdivision shall not be construed to require a licensed real estate broker to retain electronic messages of an ephemeral nature, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 1624 of the Civil Code.

(b) The commissioner shall charge a real estate broker for the cost of any audit, if the commissioner has found, in a final desist and refrain order issued under Section 10086 or in a final decision following a disciplinary hearing held in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that the broker has violated Section 10145 or a regulation or rule of the commissioner interpreting Section 10145.

(c) If a broker fails to pay for the cost of an audit as
 described in subdivision (b) within 60 days of mailing a notice of billing, the commissioner may suspend or revoke the broker’s license or deny renewal of the broker’s license. The suspension or denial shall remain in effect until the cost is paid or until the broker’s right to renew a license has expired.

(d) The commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of the cost of an audit in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost incurred by the commissioner for an audit, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing audits of real estate brokers.

(e) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any real estate broker, real estate salesperson, or corporation licensed as a real estate broker, if the real estate
 broker, real estate salesperson, or any director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation licensed as a real estate broker knowingly destroys, alters, conceals, mutilates, or falsifies any of the books, papers, writings, documents, or tangible objects that are required to be maintained by this section or that have been sought in connection with an investigation, audit, or examination of a real estate licensee by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 4.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10149.

(a) The Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission shall develop, adopt, and publish a Homeowner’s Guide to Earthquake Safety for distribution to licensees for purposes of Section 2079.8 of the Civil Code and, upon request, to any member of the general public.

(b) In revising the guide, the commission shall consult with the Office of Emergency Services, the California Geological Survey of the Department of Conservation, and the Department of Real Estate.

(c) The commission shall, to the extent possible, rely on currently available data to update the guide. To the extent necessary, the commission may contract for the development and production of the guide. The commission shall update the contents of
 the guide whenever it determines that information within the guide is sufficiently inaccurate or incomplete so as to reduce the effectiveness of the guide. The commission may charge a fee to cover the costs of production, distribution, development, and updating the guide.

(d) The guide shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Maps and information on geologic and seismic hazard conditions for all areas of the state.

(2) Explanations of the related structural and nonstructural hazards.

(3) Recommendations for mitigating the hazards of an earthquake.

(4) Explanation that the recommendations in the guide do not guarantee the safety of an individual or prevention of
 damage to a structure in an earthquake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   (AB 100)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licenses [10150. - 10165.1.]

10150.

(a) Application for the real estate broker license examination shall be made in writing to the commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe the format and content of the broker examination application. The application for the broker examination shall include valid contact information at which the department may contact the applicant and shall be accompanied by the real estate broker license examination fee.

(b) Persons who have been notified by the commissioner that they passed the real estate broker license examination may apply for a real estate broker license. A person applying for the broker examination may also apply for a real estate broker license. However, a license shall not
 be issued until the applicant passes the real estate broker license examination. If there is any change to the information contained in a real estate broker license application after the application has been submitted and before the license has been issued, the commissioner may require the applicant to submit a supplement to the application listing the changed information.

(c) Application for the real estate broker license shall be made in writing to the commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe the format and content of the broker license application. The application for the real estate broker license shall include valid contact information at which the department may contact the applicant and shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee.

(d) Application for an endorsement to
 act as a mortgage loan originator, as defined in Section 10166.01, shall be made either electronically or in writing as directed by the commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe the format and content of the mortgage loan originator endorsement application, which shall meet the minimum requirements for licensing of a mortgage loan originator, pursuant to the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-289).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 5.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10150.6.

(a) In addition to satisfying the other requirements of this article, and except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), an applicant for an original real estate broker’s license shall demonstrate to the Real Estate Commissioner that they have held a real estate salesperson’s license for at least two years and qualified for the renewal of their real estate salesperson status, within the five-year period immediately prior to the date of their application for the broker’s license, and during that time were actively engaged in the business of real estate salesperson.

(b) An applicant for a real estate broker’s license having at least the equivalent of two years’ general real estate
 experience within the five-year period immediately prior to the date of their application for the broker’s license may file a written petition with the Department of Real Estate setting forth their qualifications and experience, and, if the commissioner approves, they may be issued a real estate broker’s license immediately upon passing the examination and satisfying the other requirements of this article.

(c) In considering a petition described in subdivision (b), the commissioner may treat a degree from a four-year college or university, which course of study included a major or minor in real
 estate, as the equivalent of two years’ general real estate experience. In considering a petition described in subdivision (b), the commissioner may consider degrees that were completed before the five-year period immediately prior to the date of the application for a broker’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10151.

(a) Application for the real estate salesperson license examination shall be made in writing to the commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe the format and content of the salesperson examination application. The application for the salesperson examination shall include valid contact information at which the department may contact the applicant and shall be accompanied by the real estate salesperson license examination fee.

(b) Persons who have been notified by the commissioner that they passed the real estate salesperson license examination may apply for a real estate salesperson license. A person applying for the salesperson examination may also apply for a real estate salesperson
 license. However, a license shall not be issued until the applicant passes the real estate salesperson license examination. If there is any change to the information contained in a real estate salesperson license application after the application has been submitted and before the license has been issued, the commissioner may require the applicant to submit a supplement to the application listing the changed information.

(c) (1) The commissioner may prescribe the format and content of the real estate salesperson license application. The application for the real estate salesperson license shall include valid contact information at which the department may contact the applicant.

(2) An application for the real estate salesperson license examination or for both the
 examination and license shall include evidence or certification, satisfactory to the commissioner, of successful completion at an accredited institution of a three-semester unit course, or the quarter equivalent thereof, or successful completion of an equivalent course of study as defined in Section 10153.5 in real estate principles as well as the successful completion at an accredited institution of a course in real estate practice as set forth in Section 10153.2, and one additional course as set forth in Section 10153.2, other than real estate principles, real estate practice, advanced legal aspects of real estate, advanced real estate finance, or advanced real estate appraisal. The applicant shall provide this evidence or certification to the commissioner prior to taking the real estate salesperson license examination.

(d) The commissioner
 shall waive the requirements of this section for the following applicants:

(1) An applicant who is a member of the State Bar of California.

(2) An applicant who has qualified to take the examination for an original real estate broker license by satisfying the requirements of Section 10153.2.

(e) Application for endorsement to act as a mortgage loan originator, as defined in Section 10166.01, shall be made either electronically or in writing as directed by the commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe the format and the content of the mortgage loan originator endorsement application, which shall meet the minimum requirements for licensing of a mortgage loan originator, pursuant to the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage
 Licensing Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-289).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 8.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10151.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “member of the Armed Forces of the United States” includes the following persons and no others: all members of the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United States Space Force, the Marine Corps, the Merchant Marine in time of war, the Coast Guard, the National Guard, and all officers of the Public Health Service detailed by proper authority for duty either with the Army or the Navy.

(b) The commissioner shall inquire in every application for licensure under this part if the individual applying for
 licensure:

(1) Is, or previously was, a member of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) Intends to apply military experience towards broker licensure requirements.

(c) The commissioner shall expedite, and may assist, the initial licensure process for an applicant who supplies satisfactory evidence to the department that the applicant has served as an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States and was honorably
 discharged.

(d) The commissioner shall expedite the licensure process for an applicant who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Supplies evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the applicant is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is assigned to a duty station in this state under official active duty military orders.

(2) Holds a current license in another state, district, or territory of the United States in the profession or vocation for which the applicant seeks a license from the commissioner.

(e) As required by Section 115.10, the commissioner shall register
 applicants who are military service members or spouses of service members. Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 115.10, a person registered shall be deemed to be a licensee of the department for purposes of the laws administered by the department relating to standards of practice, discipline, and continuing education for the duration of the military orders described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 115.10, and the registration shall expire when those military orders expire. Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 115.10, the commissioner may take appropriate enforcement action against a person registered, including, but not limited to, revoking or suspending the registration of a person who does not meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of
 Section 115.10 or the laws applicable to licensees. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(f) The commissioner shall post information on the department’s internet website about the ability of applicants who have served as members of the Armed Forces of the United States to apply military experience towards broker licensure requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 9.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10151.3.

The Department of Real Estate shall compile information on military, veteran, and spouse licensure into an annual report for the Legislature, which shall be submitted in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include all of the following:

(a) The number of applications for expedited licenses submitted by veterans and active duty spouses pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 10151.2.

(b) The number of licenses issued and denied per calendar year pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 10151.2.

(c) The average length of time between
 application and issuance of licenses pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 10151.2 per license type.

(d) The number of applicants for a broker license who request to apply military experience towards meeting licensure requirements.

(e) The number of applicants for a broker license
 whose military experience was accepted by the department to meet licensure requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 10.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10151.5.

(a) An applicant who is not a resident of this state shall be eligible for a real estate license provided (1) the applicant qualifies for licensure under this chapter, including Section 10162, and (2) the state or other jurisdiction that is the place of residence of the applicant permits a resident of California to qualify for and obtain a real estate license in that jurisdiction.

(b) A foreign corporation shall be exempt from the eligibility requirement set forth in clause (2) of subdivision (a) if, and for so long as, at least one of the officers of the corporation who is designated and licensed as a real estate broker pursuant to Section 10158 or 10211 is a resident of this state.

(c) Every nonresident applicant for a real estate license shall, along with their application, file with the Real Estate Commissioner an irrevocable consent that if in any action commenced against the person in this state, personal service of process upon the person cannot be made in this state after the exercise of due diligence, a valid service may thereupon be made upon the applicant by delivering the process to the Department of Real Estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 8.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10152.

(a) The commissioner may require any other proof he or she may deem advisable concerning the honesty and truthfulness of an applicant for a real estate license or license examination, or of the officers, directors, or persons owning 10 percent or more of the stock, of a corporation making application therefor, before authorizing the issuance of a real estate license. For this purpose the commissioner may
 call a hearing in accordance with this part relating to hearings. To assist in his or her determination the commissioner shall require every original applicant to be fingerprinted prior to issuing a license. The commissioner may require the fingerprints to be submitted either with the application to take the license examination or with the application for a real estate license.

(b) The commissioner shall require a person who submits a petition for reinstatement of his or her license or reduction of a penalty pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code, in addition to meeting any other requirements imposed for purposes of the reinstatement or penalty reduction, to submit his or her fingerprints with the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 3.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10152.5.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all of the following:

(1) Original applicants for a salesperson license, pursuant to Section 10151.

(2) Original applicants for a broker license, pursuant to Section 10150.

(3) Persons seeking to be designated as the officer of a broker who is a corporation, pursuant to Section 10211.

(4) Real estate salesperson licensees, as defined in Section 10016.

(5) Real estate broker licensees, as defined in Section 10015.

(6) Designated officers of a corporation licensed as a broker, as described in Section 10211.

(7) Persons who submit a petition for reinstatement of the person’s license or the reduction of a penalty, pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code.

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response, pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 11.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.

In addition to the proof of honesty and truthfulness required of any applicant for a real estate license, the commissioner shall ascertain by written examination that the applicant, and in case of a corporation applicant for a real estate broker’s license that each officer, or agent thereof through whom it proposes to act as a real estate licensee, has all of the following:

(a) An appropriate knowledge of the English language, including reading, writing, and spelling and of arithmetical computations common to real estate and business opportunity practices.

(b) An understanding of the principles of real estate and business opportunity conveyancing,
 the general purposes and general legal effect of agency contracts, deposit receipts, deeds, mortgages, deeds of trust, chattel mortgages, bills of sale, land contracts of sale and leases, and of the principles of business and land economics and appraisals.

(c) A general and fair understanding of the obligations between principal and agent, of the principles of real estate and business opportunity practice and the canons of business ethics pertaining thereto, of the provisions of this part, of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2, and of the regulations of the Real Estate Commissioner as contained in Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 12.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.01.

(a) No person shall cheat on, subvert, or attempt to subvert a licensing examination given by the department. Cheating on, subverting, or attempting to subvert a licensing examination includes, but is not limited to, engaging in, soliciting, or procuring any of the following:

(1) Any communication between one or more examinees and any person, other than a proctor or examination official, while the
 examination is in progress.

(2) Copying answers from another examinee or permitting one’s answers to be copied by another examinee.

(3) The taking of all or a part of the examination by a person other than the applicant.

(4) Removing from the examination room any examination materials without authorization.

(5) The unauthorized reproduction by any means of any portion of the actual licensing examination.

(6) Aiding by any means the unauthorized reproduction of any portion of the actual licensing examination.

(7) Possession or use at any time during the examination or while the examinee is on the examination premises of any
 device, material, or document that is not expressly authorized for use by examinees during the examination, including, but not limited to, notes, crib sheets, textbooks, and electronic devices.

(8) Failure to follow any examination instruction or rule related to examination security.

(9) Providing false, fraudulent, or materially misleading information concerning education, experience, or other qualifications as part of, or in support of, any application for admission to an examination.

(b) The commissioner may bar any candidate who willfully cheats on, subverts, or attempts to subvert an examination from taking any license examination and from holding an active real estate license under any provision of this code for a period of up to three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 4.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.1.

It is unlawful for any person with respect to any examination under this part to practice any deception or fraud with regard to his or her identity in connection with any examination, application, or request to be examined.

Any person who willfully violates or knowingly participates in the violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.2.

(a) An applicant to take the examination for an original real estate broker license shall also submit evidence, satisfactory to the commissioner, of successful completion, at an accredited institution, of:

(1) A three-unit semester course, or the quarter equivalent thereof, in each of the following:

(A) Real estate practice, which shall include both of the following:

(i) A component on implicit bias, including education regarding the impact of implicit bias, explicit bias, and systemic bias on consumers, the historical and social impacts of those biases, and actionable
 steps students can take to recognize and address their own implicit biases.

(ii) A component on federal and state fair housing laws as those laws apply to the practice of real estate. The fair housing component shall include an interactive participatory component, during which the applicant shall roleplay as both a consumer and real estate professional.

(B) Legal aspects of real estate.

(C) Real estate appraisal.

(D) Real estate financing.

(E) Real estate economics or accounting.

(2) A three-unit semester course, or the quarter equivalent thereof,
 in three of the following:

(A) Advanced legal aspects of real estate.

(B) Advanced real estate finance.

(C) Advanced real estate appraisal.

(D) Business law.

(E) Escrows.

(F) Real estate principles.

(G) Property management.

(H) Real estate office administration.

(I) Mortgage loan brokering and lending.

(J) Computer applications in real estate.

(K) On and after July 1, 2004, California law that relates to common interest developments, including, but not limited to, topics addressed in the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4 of the Civil Code) and in the Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Development Act (Part 5.3 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(b) The commissioner shall waive the requirements of this section for an applicant who is a member of the State Bar of California and shall waive the requirements for which an applicant has successfully completed an equivalent course of study as determined under Section 10153.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 13.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.3.

(a) Licenses that were suspended pursuant to former Section 10153.4, as it read on December 31, 2025, and for which the current license status remains suspended due to former Section 10153.4, as that section read on December 31, 2025, shall be deemed expired. The expiration date shall be four years following the date of issuance of the license.

(b) The department shall update its records to reflect this change.

(c) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 15.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.5.

As used in Sections 10151 and 10153.2, “an equivalent course of study” consists of courses at a private vocational school that have been found by the commissioner, upon consideration of an application for approval, to be equivalent in quality to the real estate courses offered by the colleges and universities accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges.
